California statutes. Education Code
The funds received by the state shall be expended by the officers or agency administering the program to carry out the provisions of the act of the Congress and rules and regulations lawfully adopted thereunder. Such funds are exempt from the provisions of Section 925.6 of the Government Code and shall be paid out by the Treasurer on warrants drawn by the State Controller on claims submitted by the trustees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89752.

The trustees shall prescribe rules and regulations subject to the approval of and audit by the Department of Finance covering the collection, custody, and disposition of any and all money collected by any state college.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89753.

All appropriations for the support of the California State University and the trustees shall be subject to Section 13320 of the Government Code and applicable Budget Act restrictions, with the following exceptions:

(a) The trustees may, with regard to funds appropriated for the support of the California State University, approve any transfer of funds between general fund appropriations and support appropriations, unless restricted by the Budget Act or any other act, and within and between any category designated in any schedule set forth for the appropriation. In addition, the
 trustees may authorize the augmentation of the amount available for a category designated in any schedule set forth for the appropriation by transfer from any of the other designated categories, including additional reimbursements and amounts receivable within the same schedule, and shall furnish the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and appropriate legislative fiscal committees a report, on or before January 10, of the authorizations given during the preceding four quarters.

(b) The trustees may approve travel, both within and outside the state, and the payment of allowances and expenses related to travel, moving, and the relocation of employees in accordance with the allowances established by the trustees.

(c) The trustees may, within funds appropriated for the support of the California State University, establish new positions and make changes in existing positions and the
 position payroll roster.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 44.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

89754.

The intent of Section 89753 is to give the trustees maximum responsibility within available funds. It is the further intent of the Legislature by said provisions to allow the trustees greater flexibility in their financial affairs and to allow the individual campuses greater flexibility in the expenditure of their appropriations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89755.

All actions of the trustees taken pursuant to Section 89753 are limited to the fiscal year in which the action is taken and subject to audit by the Department of Finance, as well as legislative review, prior to extension into the subsequent fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89756.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the chief administrative officer of each campus of the California State University shall be responsible for the propriety of the expenditure, and the integrity of the financial reporting, of the following funds received by the campus:

(1) State appropriations.

(2) Gifts.

(3) Bequests.

(4) Trust funds.

(5) Grants, loans, or combinations thereof.

The chief administrative officer shall also be responsible for the propriety of all expenditures, and the integrity of the financial reporting, made by auxiliary organizations. The chief administrative officer of a state university is, for the purpose of this section, the president of the university.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

89757.

None of the funds enumerated in Section 89756, nor any of the funds of an auxiliary organization, shall ever be used by any university or college for membership or for any participation involving a financial payment or contribution, on behalf of the institution, or any individual employed by or associated therewith, in any private organization whose membership practices are discriminatory on the basis of the characteristics listed in Section 66270. This section does not apply to any public funds that have been paid to an individual employee or officer as salary, or to any funds that are used directly or indirectly for the benefit of student organizations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 55.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

89758.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, obligations may be incurred for the summer quarter operation in the California State University at campuses on year-round operations, subsequent to enactment of a Budget Act and prior to July 1, payable from the appropriations contained in such Budget Act for those purposes. The obligations and the payment thereof shall be subject to Section 89753.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 153.)
-------------------------------------------

89759.

Notwithstanding Sections 935.6, 948, 965, and 965.2 of the Government Code, or any other provision of law to the contrary, the Controller shall draw a warrant for the payment of any claim, settlement, or judgment against a special fund or a trust fund administered by the trustees if the trustees certify that sufficient moneys for the payment of the claim, settlement, or judgment exist within the special fund or trust fund. Records regarding the payments are subject to post audit by the Director of Finance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 414, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

89760.

(a) The trustees may transfer money from one special fund to another special fund or to the general fund in order to meet the commitments of the California State University if the transferred moneys are returned to the special fund of origin in time to fulfill the purposes of the special fund. Interest shall be paid on all money transferred to another special fund or to the general fund at a rate determined by the trustees to be the current earning rate of the fund from which the money was transferred.

(b) “Special fund,” as used in this section, means enterprise and trust funds of the California State University and includes any fund subject to the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947 (Article 2 (commencing with Section 90010) of Chapter 8 of Part 55).

(c) This section does not authorize any transfer or loan of money to or from any special fund or the General Fund if the transfer or loan would impair a contractual obligation of the trustees, including, but not necessarily limited to, contractual obligations incurred by the trustees pursuant to the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 954, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

89761.

(a) The California State University shall adhere to uniform accounting standards in accordance with Generally Accepted Accounting Principles (GAAP) for institutions of higher education.

(b) In the 1993–94 fiscal year, the California State University on five campuses representing the diversity of the system in both size of student body and campus budget shall have an independent audit of all funds performed and an independent audit report prepared.

(c) A copy of the audit reports shall be available for public inspection in the library of each campus of the university.

(d) The costs associated with the annual independent audit and audits performed pursuant to Section 89045 shall be funded from existing resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 41.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

89762.

(a) The contributions of the California State University to the Public Employees’ Retirement Fund, as provided by Section 20822 of the Government Code, shall be based on pensionable compensation and the rates set forth in the Budget Act, and shall be paid out of the California State University total appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(b) Beginning in the 2013–14 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, annual adjustments to the budget allocation for California State University pension contributions shall be based on the university’s actual 2013–14 fiscal year pensionable payroll, as identified by the Controller’s office, by funding source and state member categories, and
 the incremental change in the rates set forth in the annual Budget Act.

(c) Budget adjustments under this section shall not be made for subsequent changes in payroll.

(d) Pension funding for the university shall be identified annually in the Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 50, Sec. 5.   (AB 94)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Use of General Fund Support Appropriations for Capital Expenditures and Capital Outlay Projects [89770. - 89774.]

89770.

(a) (1) The California State University may pledge, in addition to any of its other revenues that the university chooses to pledge, its annual General Fund support appropriation less the amount of that appropriation required to fund general obligation bond payments and State Public Works Board rental payments, to secure the payment of debt obligations issued by the Trustees of the California State University pursuant to the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947 (Article 2 (commencing with Section 90010) of Chapter 8).

(2) To the extent the university pledges any part of its support appropriation as a source of revenue securing any obligation, it shall provide that this commitment of revenue is
 subject to annual appropriation by the Legislature.

(3) The university may fund debt service for capital expenditures defined in subdivision (b), and the costs or expenses incidental to the issuance and sale of bonds to finance those costs, including, but not limited to, capitalized interest on the bonds, from its General Fund support appropriation pursuant to Sections 89772 and 89773.

(4) The state hereby covenants with the holders of the university’s obligations, secured by the pledge of the university authorized by this section, that so long as any of the obligations referred to in this subdivision remain outstanding, the state will not impair or restrict the ability of the university to pledge any support appropriation or support appropriations that may be enacted for the university. The university may include this covenant of the state in the agreements or other documents
 underlying the university’s obligations to this effect.

(b) For purposes of this section, “capital expenditures” means any of the following:

(1) The costs to acquire real property to design, construct, or equip academic facilities to address seismic and life safety needs, enrollment growth, or modernization of out-of-date facilities, and renewal or expansion of infrastructure to serve academic programs.

(2) The debt service amount associated with refunding, defeasing, or retiring State Public Works Board lease revenue bonds.

(3) The costs to design, construct, or equip energy conservation projects.

(4) The costs of deferred maintenance of academic facilities and related infrastructure.

(c) This section does not require the Legislature to make an appropriation from the General Fund in any specific amount to support the California State University.

(d) The ability to utilize its support appropriation as stated in this section shall not be used as a justification for future increases in student tuition, additional employee layoffs, or reductions in employee compensation at the California State University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 137.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

89771.

(a) The California State University may fund pay-as-you-go capital outlay projects from its General Fund support appropriation pursuant to Sections 89772 and 89773.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “capital outlay project” means the costs to acquire real property to design, construct, or equip academic facilities to address seismic and life safety needs, enrollment growth, or modernization of out-of-date facilities; renewal or expansion of infrastructure to serve academic programs; and the costs to design, construct, or equip energy conservation projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 24.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

89772.

(a) (1) Commencing with the 2014–15 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, if the California State University plans to use any of its support appropriation in the annual budget, or any other revenues pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 89770, for the subsequent fiscal year for capital expenditures, pursuant to and as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 89770, or for capital outlay projects pursuant to Section 89771, it shall simultaneously submit, on or before September 1, 10 months before the commencement of that fiscal year, a preliminary report to the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider the state budget, the budget subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations
 for the California State University, and the Department of Finance.

(2) The preliminary report shall detail the scope of all capital expenditures and capital outlay projects and how those capital expenditures and capital outlay projects will be funded, and it shall provide the same level of detail as a capital outlay budget change proposal.

(3) The California State University shall submit, on or before December 1, a final report to the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider the state budget, the budget subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations for the California State University, and the Department of Finance.

(4) The final report shall detail the scope of all capital expenditures and capital outlay projects and how those capital expenditures and capital outlay
 projects will be funded, and it shall provide the same level of detail as a capital outlay budget change proposal.

(5) The Department of Finance shall review the final report and submit, by February 1, a list of preliminarily approved capital expenditures and capital outlay projects to the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider the state budget and the budget subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations for the California State University. These committees may review and respond to the list of preliminarily approved capital expenditures and capital outlay projects before April 1.

(6) The Department of Finance shall submit a final list of approved capital expenditures and capital outlay projects to the California State University by no earlier than April 1, three months before the commencement of the fiscal year of the planned
 expenditures.

(b) The Department of Finance may approve capital expenditures, as defined in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 89770, no sooner than 30 days after submitting, in writing, a list of expenditures being considered for approval, to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider the state budget and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(c) The California State University shall not use its General Fund support appropriation to fund any capital expenditures, as defined in paragraphs (1), (3), and (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 89770, or capital outlay projects defined in subdivision (b) of Section 89771 before receiving approval from the Department of Finance
 pursuant to this section.

(d) (1) For the 2014–15 fiscal year only, if the California State University plans to use any of its support appropriation in the annual budget for the 2014–15 fiscal year for capital expenditures defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 89770 or for capital outlay projects pursuant to Section 89771, the California State University shall simultaneously submit, on or before August 1, 2014, a report to the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider the state budget, the budget subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations for the California State University, and the Department of Finance. This report shall detail the scope of all capital expenditures and capital outlay projects and how those capital expenditures and capital outlay projects will be funded. This report shall include the same level of detail as a capital outlay budget change
 proposal.

(2) The Department of Finance shall review, by November 1, 2014, the report and submit a list of preliminarily approved capital expenditures and capital outlay projects to the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the budget subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations for the California State University. These committees may review and respond to the list of preliminarily approved capital expenditures and capital outlay projects before December 1, 2014.

(3) The Department of Finance shall submit a final list of approved projects to the California State University no earlier than December 1, 2014.

(4) The California State University shall not proceed with any capital expenditures defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section
 89770 or capital outlay projects defined in Section 89771, before receiving approval from the Department of Finance pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), commencing with the 2014–15 fiscal year, the California State University may use its support appropriation in the annual budget for the capital expenditures and capital outlay projects identified in the resolution approved by the Trustees of the California State University on January 28, 2015, titled “Approval to Issue Trustees of the California State University, Systemwide Revenue Bonds and Related Debt Instruments for Systemwide Infrastructure Improvement Projects (RFIN 01-15-04).”

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), commencing with the 2015–16 fiscal year, the California State University may use its support appropriation in the annual budget for the capital expenditures
 and capital outlay projects identified in the “2015–2016 CSU/State Funded Capital Outlay Program” referenced in the resolution approved by the Trustees of the California State University on November 13, 2014, titled “Approval of the 2015–2016 Capital Outlay Program and the 2015–2016 through 2019–2020 Five-Year Capital Improvement Program (RCPBG 11-14-17).”

(f) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, commencing with the 2015–16 fiscal year, on or before February 1 of each fiscal year, the California State University shall simultaneously submit a progress report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the Department of Finance detailing the scope, funding, and current status of all capital expenditures undertaken pursuant to Section 89770 and for all capital outlay projects undertaken pursuant to Section 89771.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 22, Sec. 21.   (SB 81)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

89773.

The California State University shall manage its debt programs in a manner so that not more than 12 percent of its General Fund support appropriation, less the amount of that appropriation that is required to fund general obligation bond payments and State Public Works Board rental payments, is used for the total of both of the following:

(a) Debt service for capital expenditures pursuant to Section 89770.

(b) Pay-as-you-go capital outlay projects pursuant to Section 89771.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 24.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

89774.

Notwithstanding any other law, excluding Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the California State University may proceed with capital expenditures and capital outlay projects pursuant to Sections 89772 and 89773 without the need for any further limitations or approvals, except those delineated in Sections 89772 and 89773.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 34, Sec. 24.   (SB 860)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. California State University, Los Angeles Physical Sciences Renovation Project [89775. - 89775.]

89775.

Any remaining proceeds for the California State University deposited in the 1996 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund created by Section 100115, the 2002 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund established by subdivision (b) of Section 100650, the 2004 Higher Education Capital Outlay Bond Fund established by subdivision (b) of Section 100850, and the 2006 University Capital Outlay Bond Fund established by subdivision (b) of Section 101040 is hereby appropriated and allocated to the California State University for the construction phase of the Los Angeles Physical Sciences Building Renovation project, the expenditure of which is not subject to subdivision (b) of Section 89772.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 25.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Auxiliary Organizations [89900. - 89928.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [89900. - 89912.]

89900.

(a) A certified public accountant shall be selected by each auxiliary organization described in Section 89901. The office of the chancellor, in cooperation with the Department of Finance, shall develop and forward the applicable auditing and reporting procedures to each auxiliary organization for distribution to the selected certified public accountant. In accordance with procedures prescribed by the chancellor, the certified public accountant shall annually audit any and all state university auxiliary funds. The auxiliary organizations shall contract for and receive the audit annually, and shall submit the audit to the trustees. Auxiliary organizations shall annually publish an audited statement of their financial condition, which statement shall be disseminated as widely as feasible and be available to any person on request. In the case of an auxiliary organization primarily serving a single campus of the California State University, publication in the campus student newspaper shall be deemed compliance with this requirement. In the case of an auxiliary organization serving the Trustees of the California State University, distribution of the published audited statement of its financial condition at a regularly scheduled meeting of the trustees shall be deemed compliance with this requirement. 

(b) In the case of an auxiliary organization primarily serving a single campus of the California State University, the president of that state university shall be responsible for ascertaining that all expenditures are in accordance with policies of the trustees, the propriety of all expenditures, and the integrity of the financial reporting, made by auxiliary organizations. 

(c) The operation of auxiliary organizations shall be conducted in conformity with regulations established by the trustees. The regulations shall include provisions requiring the governing board of each auxiliary organization to provide salaries, working conditions, and benefits for the full-time employees of each auxiliary organization that are comparable to those provided California State University employees performing similar services. However, the regulations may permit retirement benefits or permanent status benefits, or both, to be withheld from temporary and executive employees of each auxiliary organization. In addition, the regulations may exempt from the requirement of providing retirement benefits any auxiliary organization that is funded primarily by mandatory student fees collected by the trustees. For the purposes of this subdivision, a temporary employee is (a) an employee employed for a research project, workshop, institute, or other special project funded by any grant, contract or gift; or (b) an employee whose contract of employment is for a fixed term not exceeding three years. For the purposes of this subdivision, an executive employee is any management employee with responsibility for the development and execution of auxiliary organization policy and includes, but is not limited to, general managers, business managers, directors, and the like. For purposes of this subdivision, “full-time employee” means a person who is employed in a permanent position for 40 hours per week or for the required number of hours of a particular work shift, whichever is the lesser. Persons employed on a temporary, intermittent, irregular time base, or on a limited term basis are not “full-time employees,” unless those employees are engaged on a continuing 10-month or academic year basis and are employed for 40 hours per week or for the required number of hours of a particular work shift, whichever is the lesser. For those full-time employees whose duties are not comparable to classes in California State University employment, the salaries established shall be at least equal to the salaries prevailing in other educational institutions in the area or commercial operations of like nature. This requirement shall apply to full-time employees of auxiliary organizations even if there are no California State University employees performing similar services. 

(d) Retirement benefits may be provided by other than the Public Employees’ Retirement System. A contract for participation in the Public Employees’ Retirement System in accordance with the terms and conditions of the Public Employees’ Retirement Law shall be deemed to satisfy fully the requirements of subdivision (c) with respect to retirement. 

Notwithstanding anything in subdivision (c) to the contrary, the regulations established by the trustees may exempt the governing board of any newly created auxiliary organization from the requirement of providing retirement benefits for a period not to exceed three years from the date that the auxiliary organization is established.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 414, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

89901.

As used in this article, the term “auxiliary organization” includes the following entities:

(a) Any entity in which any official of the California State University participates as a director as part of his or her official position.

(b) Any entity formed or operating pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 89300) of Chapter 3.

(c) Any entity which operates a commercial service for the benefit of a campus of the California State University on a campus or other property of the California State University.

(d) Any entity whose governing instrument provides in substance both of the following:

(1) That its purpose is to promote or assist any campus of the California State University, or to receive gifts, property, and funds to be used for the benefit of such campus or any person or organization having an official relationship therewith.

(2) That any of its directors, governors, or trustees are either appointed or nominated by, or subject to, the approval of an official of any campus of the California State University, or selected, ex officio, from the membership of the student body or the faculty or the administrative staff of campus.

(e) Any entity whose governing instrument provides in substance both of the following:

(1) That its purpose is to promote or assist the trustees of the California State University, or to receive gifts, property, and funds to be used for the benefit of the trustees of the California State University or any person or organization having an official relationship therewith.

(2) That any of its directors, governors, or trustees are either appointed or nominated by, or subject to, the approval of the trustees or an official of the California State University, or selected, ex officio, from the membership of the trustees or the administrative staff of the California State University.

(f) Any entity which, exclusive of the foregoing subdivisions of this section, is designated as an auxiliary organization by the trustees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

89902.

This article shall not apply to any student body organization not formed or operating pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 89300) of Chapter 3 nor to any student or faculty society, social club, fraternity, or sorority, nor to any alumni association, whether officially recognized as a campus organization or not, unless it is described in Section 89901.

This section shall not be construed to alter or limit the powers of the trustees to establish rules and regulations governing organizations which maintain an official relationship with any campus of the California State University or which use the name or facilities of the campus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

89903.

(a) (1) Each auxiliary organization formed pursuant to this article shall have a board of directors composed, both as to size and categories of membership, in accordance with regulations established by the Trustees of the California State University.

(2) If, in any fiscal year, a majority of the funding of the auxiliary organization is received from student fees collected on a campus or systemwide, at least a majority of the board of directors of that auxiliary organization shall consist of California State University students with full voting privileges on that board. This paragraph shall only be applicable to effectuate a change in the membership of a board of directors of an auxiliary organization if the trustees determine that there is no legal or contractual barrier to changing the governing structure of that organization. In the event that the trustees determine that there is a legal or contractual barrier to changing the governing structure of an auxiliary organization, information relating to that determination shall be reported, in a timely manner, to that auxiliary organization and any affected student body organization.

(b) Each governing board shall, during each fiscal year, hold at least one business meeting in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 89920). The board shall have the benefit of the advice and counsel of at least one attorney admitted to practice law in this state and at least one licensed certified public accountant. Neither the attorney at law nor the certified public accountant need be members of the board.

(c) No auxiliary organization shall accept any grant, contract, bequest, trust, or gift, unless it is so conditioned that it may be used only for purposes consistent with policies of the trustees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 318, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

89904.

All expenditures and fund appropriations of auxiliary organizations described in Section 89903 shall be approved by the governing board of the auxiliary organization. Appropriations of funds for use outside of the normal business operations of the auxiliary organization shall be approved in accordance with trustee policy and regulations by an officer designated by the trustees.

The trustees in consultation with the Department of Finance and the governing boards of the various auxiliary organizations described in Section 89903, on or before the beginning of the 1970–1971 fiscal year, shall:

(a) Institute a standard systemwide accounting and reporting system for businesslike management of the operation of such auxiliary organizations.

(b) Implement financial standards which will assure the fiscal viability of such various auxiliary organizations. Such standards shall include proper provision for professional management, adequate working capital, adequate reserve funds for current operations and capital replacements, and adequate provisions for new business requirements.

(c) Institute procedures to assure that transactions of the auxiliary organizations are within the educational mission of the state colleges.

(d) Develop policies for the appropriation of funds derived from indirect cost payments not required to implement subdivision (b). Uses of such funds shall be regularly reported to the trustees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89904.5.

The trustees shall, by July 1, 1983, develop and implement guidelines to ensure that auxiliary organizations classified as foundations for sponsored programs, workshops, and institutes maintain fiscal viability. These guidelines shall specify how reimbursement received by a foundation for indirect costs in connection with the performance of grants or contracts which exceeds the indirect costs actually incurred by the foundation for those grants or contracts shall be divided between the foundation and the campus of the California State University which the foundation serves, in a manner consistent with the educational mission of the university.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 818, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

89904.6.

The trustees shall, by July 1, 1983, develop and implement guidelines to ensure that auxiliary organizations classified as foundations for sponsored programs, workshops, and institutes, expend discretionary funds in a manner consistent with the educational mission of the university.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 818, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89905.

Operations of commercial services on a campus of the California State University, such as a food service or bookstore, or any commercial services that may be provided in a state university union, shall, when operated by an auxiliary organization, be self-supporting.

Any surplus funds from commercial operations shall be used for such purposes as are consistent with regulations of the trustees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 157.)
-------------------------------------------

89905.5.

(a) No auxiliary organization operating a commercial service on the California State University, Chico, campus shall discontinue that commercial service without providing the campus with adequate notice of its intent to discontinue the service, and the opportunity to continue the service through another means.

(b) No commercial service operated by an auxiliary organization on the California State University, Chico, campus or any aspect of the management of the commercial services shall be taken over by the Trustees of the California State University, the Chancellor of the California State University, the president of a campus of the California State University, or another auxiliary organization unless all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The entity seeking to assume all or part of the management of the commercial service has demonstrated that the commercial service has substantial programmatic or financial difficulties.

(2) The governing board of the auxiliary organization currently operating the commercial service has been provided adequate opportunity to respond to the concerns demonstrated pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) The governing board of the entity seeking to assume all or part of the management of the commercial service has approved the assumption of the new programmatic or financial responsibility.

(4) The auxiliary organization currently operating the commercial service has been provided adequate compensation for any losses, including, but not limited to, property, inventory, services, or employees directly resulting from the assumption of all or part of the operation of the commercial service by the entity. 

(c) If an entity assumes responsibility for commercial services pursuant to subdivision (b), the entity shall be established as an official California State University auxiliary organization operating separate from, but related to, the university of service so as to protect the state from all possible liability associated with the operation of commercial services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1615, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89906.

No member of the governing board of an auxiliary organization shall be financially interested in any contract or other transaction entered into by the board of which he is a member, and any contract or transaction entered into in violation of this section is void.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89907.

No contract or other transaction entered into by the governing board of an auxiliary organization is void under the provisions of Section 89906, nor shall any member of such board be disqualified or deemed guilty of misconduct in office under said provisions, if the circumstances specified in the following subdivisions exist:

(a) The fact of such financial interest is disclosed or known to the governing board and noted in the minutes, and the governing board thereafter authorizes, approves, or ratifies the contract or transaction in good faith by a vote sufficient for the purpose without counting the vote or votes of such financially interested member or members, and

(b) The contract or transaction is just and reasonable as to the auxiliary organization at the time it is authorized or approved.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89908.

The provisions of Section 89907 shall not be applicable if the circumstances specified in any of the following subdivisions exist:

(a) The contract or transaction is between an auxiliary organization and a member of the governing board of that auxiliary organization.

(b) The contract or transaction is between an auxiliary organization and a partnership or unincorporated association of which any member of the governing board of that auxiliary organization is a partner or in which he is the owner or holder, directly or indirectly, of a proprietorship interest.

(c) The contract or transaction is between an auxiliary organization and a corporation in which any member of the governing board of that auxiliary organization is the owner or holder, directly or indirectly, of 5 percent or more of the outstanding common stock.

(d) A member of the governing board of an auxiliary organization is interested in a contract or transaction within the meaning of Section 89906, and without first disclosing such interest to the governing board at a public meeting of the board, influences or attempts to influence another member or members of the board to enter into the contract or transaction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89909.

It is unlawful for any person to utilize any information, not a matter of public record, which is received by him by reason of his membership on the governing board of an auxiliary organization, for personal pecuniary gain, regardless of whether he is or is not a member of the governing board at the time such gain is realized.
